Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4510
Formalities.

An exercise of the decanting power must be made in a record signed by an authorized fiduciary. The signed record must, directly or by reference to the notice required by section 30-4507, identify the first trust and the second trust or trusts and state the property of the first trust being distributed to each second trust and the property, if any, that remains in the first trust.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 20.